District of Columbia, session 26, PR26-0017.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
resolution may be cited as the “Early Childhood Educator Pay Scales Congressional Review
Emergency Declaration Resolution of 2025”.
Sec. 2. (a) On October 15, 2024, the Council adopted the Early Childhood Educator Pay
Scales Emergency Amendment Act of 2024, effective October 31, 2024 (D.C. Act 25-619; 71
DCR 13549) (“emergency act”), which expires on January 29, 2025.
(b) The Early Childhood Educator Pay Scales Temporary Amendment Act of 2024,
enacted on November 22, 2024 (D.C. Act 25-637, 71 DCR 14472) (“temporary act”), is pending
congressional review.
(c) This identical emergency legislation is necessary to prevent a gap in the law between
the expiration of the emergency act and the effective date of the temporary measure.
Sec. 3. The Council of the District of Columbia determines that the circumstances
enumerated in section 2 constitute emergency circumstances making it necessary that the Early
Childhood Educator Pay Scales Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2025 be
adopted after a single reading.
Sec. 4. This resolution shall take effect immediately.